Idaho, session 2026, S1291.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. IDAHO CODE CLEANUP -- LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent
of the Legislature to ensure that the state laws provided in Idaho Code are
streamlined, up-to-date, and essential for the citizens of Idaho, while best
serving the public health, safety, and welfare. In accordance with the Idaho
Code Cleanup Act, following comprehensive review, the Legislature has iden-
tified the provisions of this act as obsolete, outdated, or unnecessary.
SECTION 2. That Section 33-117, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. That Section 33-125B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Section 33-140, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. That Section 33-356, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 6. That Section 33-1010, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 7. That Section 33-1011, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 8. That Section 33-1012, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 9. That Section 33-1624, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 10. That Section 33-2007, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 11. That Section 33-2213, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 12. That Section 33-3305, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 13. That Section 33-4605, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 14. That Section 33-1002, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1002. EDUCATIONAL SUPPORT PROGRAM. The educational support pro-
gram is calculated as follows:
(1) State Educational Support Funds. Add the state appropriation, in-
cluding the moneys available in the public school income fund, together with
all miscellaneous revenues to determine the total state funds.
(2) From the total state funds subtract the following amounts needed
for state support of special programs provided by a school district:
(a) Pupil tuition-equivalency allowances as provided in section
33-1002B, Idaho Code;
(b) Transportation support program as provided in section 33-1006,
Idaho Code;
(c) Feasibility studies allowance as provided in section 33-1007A,
Idaho Code;
(d) The approved costs for border district allowance, provided in sec-
tion 33-1403, Idaho Code, as determined by the state superintendent of
public instruction;
(e) The approved costs for exceptional child approved contract al-
lowance, provided in subsection 2. of section 33-2004, Idaho Code, as
determined by the state superintendent of public instruction;
(f) Salary-based apportionment calculated as provided in sections
33-1004 through 33-1004F, Idaho Code;
(g) Unemployment insurance benefit payments according to the provi-
sions of section 72-1349A, Idaho Code;
(h) For expenditure as provided by the public school technology pro-
gram;


(i) For employee severance payments as provided in section 33-521,
Idaho Code;
(j) For distributions to the Idaho digital learning academy as provided
in section 33-1020, Idaho Code;
(k) For charter school facilities funds and reimbursements paid pur-
suant to section 33-5207, Idaho Code;
(l) For an online course portal as provided for in section 33-1024,
Idaho Code;
(m) For advanced opportunities as provided for in chapter 46, title 33,
Idaho Code;
(n) For additional math and science courses for high school students as
provided in section 33-1021, Idaho Code;
(o) For master teacher premiums as provided in section 33-1004I, Idaho
Code;
(p) For the support of provisions that provide a safe environment con-
ducive to student learning and maintain classroom discipline, an allo-
cation of three hundred dollars ($300) per support unit;
(q) An amount specified in the appropriation bill for the public
schools educational support program for counseling support as provided
for in section 33-1212A, Idaho Code, shall be distributed for grades 8
through 12 as follows:
(i) For school districts and public charter schools with one hun-
dred (100) or more students enrolled in grades 8 through 12, a pro
rata distribution based on students enrolled in grades 8 through
12 or eighteen thousand dollars ($18,000), whichever is greater;
(ii) For school districts and public charter schools with fewer
than one hundred (100) students enrolled in grades 8 through 12,
one hundred eighty dollars ($180) per student enrolled in grades
8 through 12 or nine thousand dollars ($9,000), whichever is
greater;
(r) An amount specified in the public schools educational support pro-
gram appropriation bill for literacy intervention. The disbursements
made to the school districts and public charter schools shall be calcu-
lated as follows:
(i) Fifty percent (50%) based on average full-time equivalent
enrollment of students in kindergarten through grade 3 as of the
first Friday in November;
(ii) Fifty percent (50%) based on the number of kindergarten
through grade 3 students who move a full level or who are profi-
cient from the spring-to-spring administration of the statewide
reading assessment in the prior fiscal year or, if there is not a
prior spring assessment for the student, from fall to spring; and
(iii) Funds will be distributed to the school district or pub-
lic charter school where the student is enrolled and takes the
statewide reading assessment. Any school district or public char-
ter school that has greater than one (1) but fewer than five (5)
students in kindergarten through grade 3 will receive a minimum of
two thousand dollars ($2,000). Economically disadvantaged stu-
dents shall count as one and three quarters (1.75) students for the


purpose of calculating the distribution of the funds in subpara-
graph (ii) of this paragraph.
(s) For mastery-based education as provided for in section 33-1632,
Idaho Code; and
(t) For pay for success contracting as provided in section 33-125B,
Idaho Code; and
(u) (t) Any additional amounts as required by statute to effect admin-
istrative adjustments or as specifically required by the provisions of
any bill of appropriation;
to secure the total educational support distribution funds.
(3) Average Daily Attendance. The total state average daily attendance
shall be the sum of the average daily attendance of all of the school dis-
tricts of the state. The state board of education shall establish rules set-
ting forth the procedure to determine average daily attendance and the time
for, and method of, submission of such report. Average daily attendance cal-
culation shall be carried out to the nearest hundredth. Computation of av-
erage daily attendance shall also be governed by the provisions of section
33-1003A, Idaho Code.
(4) Support Units. The total state support units shall be determined
by using the tables set out hereafter called computation of kindergarten
support units, computation of elementary support units, computation of sec-
ondary support units, computation of exceptional education support units,
and computation of alternative school support units. The sum of all of the
total support units of all school districts of the state shall be the total
state support units.
COMPUTATION OF KINDERGARTEN SUPPORT UNITS
Average Daily
Attendance Attendance Divisor Units Allowed
41 or more.... 40...................... 1 or more as computed
31 - 40.99 ADA.... -....................... 1
26 - 30.99 ADA.... -....................... .85
21 - 25.99 ADA.... -....................... .75
16 - 20.99 ADA.... -....................... .6
8 - 15.99 ADA.... -....................... .5
1 - 7.99 ADA.... -....................... count as elementary
COMPUTATION OF ELEMENTARY SUPPORT UNITS
Average Daily Minimum Units
Attendance Attendance Divisor Allowed
300 or more ADA....... ............................... .. 15
..23...grades 4,5 & 6....
..22...grades 1,2 & 3....1994-95
..21...grades 1,2 & 3....1995-96
..20...grades 1,2 & 3....1996-97


and each year thereafter.
160 to 299.99 ADA... 20................................ 8.4
110 to 159.99 ADA... 19................................ 6.8
71.1 to 109.99 ADA... 16................................ 4.7
51.7 to 71.0 ADA... 15................................ 4.0
33.6 to 51.6 ADA... 13................................ 2.8
16.6 to 33.5 ADA... 12................................ 1.4
1.0 to 16.5 ADA... n/a............................... 1.0
COMPUTATION OF SECONDARY SUPPORT UNITS
Average Daily Minimum Units
Attendance Attendance Divisor Allowed
750 or more.... 18.5..............................47
400 - 749.99 ADA.... 16................................28
300 - 399.99 ADA.... 14.5..............................22
200 - 299.99 ADA.... 13.5..............................17
100 - 199.99 ADA.... 12................................9
99.99 or fewer Units allowed as follows:
Grades 7 - 12 ..................................8
Grades 9 - 12 ..................................6
Grades 7 - 9 ..................................1 per 14 ADA
Grades 7 - 8 ..................................1 per 16 ADA
COMPUTATION OF EXCEPTIONAL EDUCATION SUPPORT UNITS
Average Daily Minimum Units
Attendance Attendance Divisor Allowed
14 or more.... 14.5..............................1 or more as
computed
12 - 13.99.... -.................................1
8 - 11.99.... -..................................75
4 - 7.99.... -..................................5
1 - 3.99.... -..................................25
COMPUTATION OF ALTERNATIVE SCHOOL SUPPORT UNITS
(Computation of alternative school support units shall include
grades 6 through 12)
Pupils in Attendance Attendance Divisor Minimum Units
Allowed
12 or more.......... 12................................ 1 or more as
computed


In applying these tables to any given separate attendance unit, no
school district shall receive less total money than it would receive if it
had a lesser average daily attendance in such separate attendance unit. In
applying the kindergarten table to a kindergarten program of fewer days
than a full school year, the support unit allowance shall be in ratio to the
number of days of a full school year. The attendance of students attending
an alternative school in a school district reporting fewer than one hundred
(100) secondary students in average daily attendance shall not be assigned
to the alternative table if the student is from a school district reporting
fewer than one hundred (100) secondary students in average daily attendance,
but shall instead be assigned to the secondary table of the school district
in which they are attending the alternative school, unless the alternative
school in question serves students from multiple districts reporting fewer
than one hundred (100) secondary students in average daily attendance. The
tables for exceptional education and alternative school support units shall
be applicable only for programs approved by the state department of educa-
tion following rules established by the state board of education. Moneys
generated from computation of support units for alternative schools shall be
utilized for alternative school programs. School district administrative
and facility costs may be included as part of the alternative school expen-
ditures.
(5) State Distribution Factor per Support Unit. Divide educational
support program distribution funds, after subtracting the amounts necessary
to pay the obligations specified in subsection (2) of this section, by the
total state support units to secure the state distribution factor per sup-
port unit.
(6) District Support Units. The number of support units for each school
district in the state shall be determined as follows:
(a)(i) Divide the actual average daily attendance, excluding stu-
dents approved for inclusion in the exceptional child educational
program for the administrative schools and each of the separate
schools and attendance units, by the appropriate divisor from the
tables of support units in this section, then add the quotients
to obtain the district's support units allowance for regular stu-
dents, kindergarten through grade 12 including alternative school
students. Calculations in application of this subsection shall be
carried out to the nearest hundredth.
(ii) Divide the combined totals of the average daily attendance
of all preschool, kindergarten, elementary, secondary, juvenile
detention center students and students with disabilities approved
for inclusion in the exceptional child program of the district by
the appropriate divisor from the table for computation of excep-
tional education support units to obtain the number of support
units allowed for the district's approved exceptional child pro-
gram. Calculations for this subsection shall be carried out to the
nearest hundredth when more than one (1) unit is allowed.
(iii) The total number of support units of the district shall be
the sum of the total support units for regular students, subpara-
graph (i) of this paragraph, and the support units allowance for


the approved exceptional child program, subparagraph (ii) of this
paragraph.
(b) Total District Allowance Educational Program. Multiply the dis-
trict's total number of support units, carried out to the nearest hun-
dredth, by the state distribution factor per support unit and to this
product add the approved amount of programs of the district provided in
subsection (2) of this section to secure the district's total allowance
for the educational support program.
(c) District Share. The district's share of state apportionment is the
amount of the total district allowance, paragraph (b) of this subsec-
tion.
(d) Adjustment of District Share. The contract salary of every noncer-
tificated teacher shall be subtracted from the district's share as cal-
culated from the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(7) Property Tax Computation Ratio. In order to receive state funds
pursuant to this section, a charter district shall utilize a school mainte-
nance and operation property tax computation ratio for the purpose of calcu-
lating its maintenance and operation levy that is no greater than that which
it utilized in tax year 1994, less four-tenths of one percent (.4%). As used
herein, the term "property tax computation ratio" shall mean a ratio deter-
mined by dividing the district's certified property tax maintenance and op-
eration budget by the actual or adjusted market value for assessment pur-
poses as such values existed on December 31, 1993. Such maintenance and op-
eration levy shall be based on the property tax computation ratio multiplied
by the actual or adjusted market value for assessment purposes as such values
existed on December 31 of the prior calendar year.
SECTION 15. That Section 33-3304, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-3304. APPROPRIATION FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AT IDAHO STATE
UNIVERSITY. Fifty percent (50%) of all the moneys that now are in or which
may hereafter accrue to the normal school income fund are hereby appropri-
ated and set apart for the support and maintenance of the department of edu-
cation at Idaho State University, the same to be available for such purpose
immediately upon their being credited to the fund. Should the legislature,
by adoption of a concurrent resolution in both houses, approve a memorandum
of understanding negotiated by the Idaho department of parks and recreation
between the city of Albion and other public or private agencies interested
in cooperative management of an Albion Normal School Field Institute within
an Albion State Normal School state park complex, the percentage share for
the department of education at Idaho State University shall be reduced from
fifty percent (50%) to forty-seven percent (47%). In the event that the mem-
orandum of understanding is not approved, section 33-3305, Idaho Code, shall
apply.
SECTION 16. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.